New York, session 2025-2026, A9433.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1 of a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the 2 general municipal law relating to electronic bell jar games, as proposed 3 in legislative bills numbers S. 6351-B and A. 7475-B, is amended to read 4 as follows: 5 Section 1. Legislative findings and purpose. 1. The legislature hereby 6 finds that: 7 (a) bell jar games are a popular and profitable fundraising mechanism 8 for bona fide not-for-profit organizations across the state, generating 9 millions of dollars in net revenues for charitable purposes every year; 10 (b) [authorized] organizations that offer bell jars and other games of 11 chance must meet strict standards established by the New York state 12 general municipal law and the New York state gaming commission, includ- 13 ing receiving a license to conduct charitable gaming activities; and 14 (c) while other types of gaming in New York state have continued to 15 expand and improve, the operation of charitable gaming activities has 16 largely remained the same over the last several decades. 17 2. (a) For the aforementioned reasons, the legislature hereby declares 18 that [authorized] veteran organizations and volunteer fire companies 19 licensed [by the New York state gaming commission] to conduct charitable 20 gaming would greatly benefit from the ability to operate electronic bell 21 jar vending machines, which display and dispense pre-printed bell jar 22 tickets that have predetermined winners and predetermined values for 23 prizes, in order to help increase charitable gaming profits across the 24 state and attract more members to join such organizations; and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10856-04-6 A. 9433 2 1 (b) Provided further, the legislature also declares that this legis- 2 lation includes appropriate safeguards to ensure that electronic bell 3 jar vending machines remain a limited and controlled fundraising tool, 4 distinct from video lottery terminals or slot machines in design and 5 function. The machines authorized herein may only be operated by 6 licensed [and authorized] veteran organizations and volunteer fire 7 companies, are limited pursuant to the provisions of subdivision 6 of 8 section 195-c of the general municipal law in order to prohibit casino- 9 like gaming parlors, and are [primarily] solely for use by members of 10 such [authorized] veteran organizations and volunteer fire companies. 11 § 2. Subdivision 3-a of section 186 of the general municipal law, as 12 amended by a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the general municipal 13 law relating to electronic bell jar games, as proposed in legislative 14 bills numbers S. 6351-B and A. 7475-B, is amended and four new subdivi- 15 sions 2-a, 22, 23, and 24 are added to read as follows: 16 2-a. "Commission" means the New York state gaming commission. 17 3-a. "Bell jars" shall mean and include those games in which a partic- 18 ipant shall draw a card from a jar, vending machine, including an elec- 19 tronic bell jar vending machine, or other suitable device or container 20 which contains numbers, colors or symbols that are covered and which, 21 when uncovered, may reveal that a prize shall be awarded on the basis of 22 a designated winning number, color or symbol or combination of numbers, 23 colors or symbols. Bell jars shall also include seal cards, coin boards, 24 event games, and merchandise boards. [An electronic bell jar vending 25 machine shall track the sales of tickets and any other information as 26 required by the commission and report such sales and other information 27 to the commission, use electronic features to display and dispense pre- 28 printed bell jar tickets, and may include audio and video features to 29 display information about a ticket being dispensed, provided that such 30 features shall not affect the outcome of the game.] 31 22. "Gaming facility" means any commercial casino licensed pursuant to 32 article thirteen of the racing, pari-mutuel wagering and breeding law, 33 or a video lottery gaming facility operating pursuant to article thir- 34 ty-four of the tax law. Locations of such facilities shall be those 35 identified by the commission. 36 23. "Veteran organization" means a members-only organization compris- 37 ing veterans and their family members, where the organization's focus is 38 on the support of and advocacy for veterans and military service members 39 and that is licensed to operate bell jar games as of November thirtieth, 40 two thousand twenty-five and shall not include any auxiliary organiza- 41 tions. 42 24. "Volunteer fire company" shall mean a fire company as defined in 43 subdivision two of section three of the volunteer firefighters' benefit 44 law, and whose members provide firefighting services on a volunteer 45 basis. 46 § 3. Subdivision 9 of section 188-a of the general municipal law, as 47 amended by a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the general municipal 48 law relating to electronic bell jar games, as proposed in legislative 49 bills numbers S. 6351-B and A. 7475-B, is amended to read as follows: 50 9. (a) The commission shall have the power to approve and establish a 51 standard set of games of chance equipment and shall by its rules and 52 regulations prescribe the manner in which such equipment is to be 53 reproduced and distributed to licensed authorized organizations. The 54 sale or distribution to a licensed authorized organization of any equip- 55 ment other than that contained in the standard set of games of chance 56 equipment shall constitute a violation of this section. A. 9433 3 1 (b) [After the effective date of this paragraph, no] No electronic 2 bell jar vending machine shall be sold, leased, distributed, installed, 3 or operated by any manufacturer, distributor, or charitable organization 4 until such machine has been approved by the commission. No electronic 5 bell jar vending machine shall be approved by the commission unless the 6 operation of the game demonstrates that there is a finite probability 7 basis of having a predetermined quantity of chances among which there is 8 a predetermined quantity of winners that pay a fixed and predetermined 9 value of prizes, regardless of the symbols that are used or how those 10 symbols are displayed on pre-printed bell jar tickets. 11 (c) The commission shall promulgate such rules and regulations as [may 12 be] the commission deems necessary for the approval and implementation 13 of electronic bell jar vending machine gaming. The commission may 14 revoke, suspend, or condition approval of an electronic bell jar vending 15 machine. [Upon request for authorization, the commission shall approve 16 or deny such request within thirty days.] If the commission denies such 17 request for approval, it shall provide the reasons for such determi- 18 nation. 19 § 4. Subdivision 3 of section 189 of the general municipal law, as 20 amended by a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the general municipal 21 law relating to electronic bell jar games, as proposed in legislative 22 bills numbers S. 6351-B and A. 7475-B, is amended to read as follows: 23 3. No authorized organization licensed under the provisions of this 24 article shall purchase, lease, or receive any supplies or equipment 25 specifically designed or adapted for use in the conduct of games of 26 chance from other than a supplier licensed by the commission or from 27 another authorized organization. Lease terms and conditions shall be 28 subject to rules and regulations promulgated by the commission. The 29 provisions of this article shall not be construed to authorize or permit 30 an authorized organization to engage in the business of leasing games of 31 chance, supplies, or equipment. Furthermore, no organization shall 32 purchase bell jar tickets or deals of bell jar tickets, or purchase 33 [or], lease or utilize any electronic bell jar vending machine, from any 34 other person or organization other than those specifically authorized 35 under sections one hundred ninety-five-n and one hundred ninety-five-o 36 of this article. 37 § 5. The opening paragraph of section 189-a of the general municipal 38 law, as amended by a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the general 39 municipal law relating to electronic bell jar games, as proposed in 40 legislative bills numbers S. 6351-B and A. 7475-B, is amended to read as 41 follows: 42 No person, firm, partnership, corporation or organization, shall sell 43 or distribute supplies or equipment specifically designed or adapted for 44 use in conduct of games of chance without having first obtained a 45 license therefor upon written application made, verified and filed with 46 the commission in the form prescribed by the rules and regulations of 47 the commission. As a part of its determination concerning the appli- 48 cant's suitability for licensing as a games of chance supplier, the 49 commission shall require the applicant to furnish to the commission two 50 sets of fingerprints. Such fingerprints shall be submitted to the divi- 51 sion of criminal justice services for a state criminal history record 52 check, as defined in subdivision one of section three thousand thirty- 53 five of the education law, and may be submitted to the federal bureau of 54 investigation for a national criminal history record check. Manufactur- 55 ers of bell jar tickets shall be considered suppliers of such equipment. 56 In each such application for a license under this section shall be stat- A. 9433 4 1 ed the name and address of the applicant; the names and addresses of its 2 officers, directors, shareholders or partners; the amount of gross 3 receipts realized on the sale and rental of games of chance supplies and 4 equipment to duly licensed authorized organizations during the last 5 preceding calendar or fiscal year, and such other information as shall 6 be prescribed by such rules and regulations. The fee for such license 7 shall be a sum equal to twenty-five dollars plus an amount equal to two 8 per centum of the gross sales and rentals, if any, of games of chance 9 equipment and supplies to authorized organizations or authorized games 10 of chance lessors by the applicant during the preceding calendar year, 11 or fiscal year if the applicant maintains their accounts on a fiscal 12 year basis; provided, however, that for manufacturers of electronic bell 13 jar vending machines, the fee for such license shall be an additional 14 one thousand dollars. No license granted pursuant to the provisions of 15 this section shall be effective for a period of more than one year. 16 § 6. Section 195-c of the general municipal law, as amended by a chap- 17 ter of the laws of 2025 amending the general municipal law relating to 18 electronic bell jar games, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 19 6351-B and A. 7475-B, is amended to read as follows: 20 § 195-c. Persons operating games; equipment; expenses; compensation. 21 1. No person shall operate any game of chance under any license issued 22 under this article except a bona fide member of the authorized organiza- 23 tion to which the license is issued, or a bona fide member of an organ- 24 ization or association which is an auxiliary to the licensee or a bona 25 fide member of an organization or association of which such licensee is 26 an auxiliary or a bona fide member of an organization or association 27 which is affiliated with the licensee by being, with it, auxiliary to 28 another organization or association. Nothing herein shall be construed 29 to limit the number of games of chance licensees for whom such persons 30 may operate games of chance nor to prevent non-members from assisting 31 the licensee in any activity other than managing or operating games. No 32 game of chance shall be conducted with any equipment except such as 33 shall be owned or leased by the authorized organization so licensed or 34 used without payment of any compensation therefor by the licensee. 35 However, in no event shall bell jar tickets be transferred from one 36 authorized organization to another, with or without payment of any 37 compensation thereof. The head or heads of the authorized organization 38 shall upon request certify, under oath, that the persons operating any 39 game of chance are bona fide members of such authorized organization, 40 auxiliary or affiliated organization. Upon request by an officer or the 41 department any such person involved in such games of chance shall certi- 42 fy that they have no criminal record. No items of expense shall be 43 incurred or paid in connection with the conducting of any game of chance 44 pursuant to any license issued under this article except those that are 45 reasonable and are necessarily expended for games of chance supplies and 46 equipment, prizes, security personnel, stated rental if any, bookkeeping 47 or accounting services according to a schedule of compensation 48 prescribed by the commission, janitorial services and utility supplies 49 if any, and license fees, and the cost of bus transportation, if author- 50 ized by such clerk or department. No commission, salary, compensation, 51 reward or recompense shall be paid or given to any person for the sale 52 or assisting with the sale of raffle tickets. 53 2. For the purpose of the sale of tickets for the game of raffle, the 54 term "operate" shall not include the sale of such tickets by persons of 55 lineal or collateral consanguinity to members of an authorized organiza- 56 tion licensed to conduct a raffle. A. 9433 5 1 3. Each electronic bell jar vending machine that has been approved by 2 the commission pursuant to paragraph (b) of subdivision nine of section 3 one hundred eighty-eight-a of this article shall do the following: 4 (a) read a barcode or similar form of encryption or marking on the 5 pre-printed bell jar ticket; 6 (b) reveal results; 7 (c) verify if a bell jar ticket is redeemable for a prize; 8 (d) electronically aggregate winning prizes for continued play; 9 (e) produce a voucher for prize redemption or proof of purchase; 10 (f) track the sales of tickets and any other information as required 11 by the commission and report such sales and other information to the 12 commission; 13 (g) prohibit spinning reels or other representations or audiovisual 14 features that mimic a video lottery terminal or slot machine; 15 (h) prohibit any electronic user interface that mimics a video slot 16 machine; 17 (i) prohibit free plays, bonus games, multipliers, jackpots; provided, 18 however, that for purposes of this paragraph, the prohibition on 19 "jackpots" shall not include prizes that may be won on the bell jar 20 ticket itself, subject to limitations set forth in regulations promul- 21 gated by the commission, discounts, promotions, special offers, or simi- 22 lar incentives to initiate or prolong player engagement; 23 (j) prohibit any feature that simulates skill or allows player input 24 to influence the outcome of a predetermined result; 25 (k) prohibit the display of near-miss outcomes that may mislead a 26 player into believing a win was narrowly missed; [and] 27 (l) track the sales of tickets and any other information as required 28 by the commission and report such sales and other information to the 29 commission; 30 (m) use electronic features to display and dispense pre-printed bell 31 jar tickets; and 32 (n) limit the speed of play to prevent rapid successive wagering as 33 required by regulations promulgated by the commission. 34 3-a. Each electronic bell jar vending machine that has been approved 35 by the commission pursuant to paragraph (b) of subdivision nine of 36 section one hundred eighty-eight-a of this article may include audio and 37 video features to display information about a ticket being dispensed, 38 provided that such features shall not affect the outcome of the game. 39 4. The following information shall be displayed by each electronic 40 bell jar vending machine: 41 (a) the total number of tickets in each deal; 42 (b) the price of each ticket; 43 (c) the number and amount of prizes in each deal; 44 (d) the number of winners per ticket and its respective winning 45 numbers or symbols; 46 (e) the name of the game; 47 (f) the name or logo of the manufacturer of the tickets and the elec- 48 tronic bell jar vending machine; 49 (g) the compulsive gambling hotline telephone number for the state of 50 New York; and 51 (h) notification that only individuals eighteen years of age or older 52 may use an electronic bell jar vending machine. 53 5. If a voucher is produced by an electronic bell jar vending machine 54 for prize redemption, the following information shall appear on such 55 voucher: 56 (a) the aggregate prize amount payable to the player; A. 9433 6 1 (b) the device number or other identification method for the vending 2 machine that produced such voucher; 3 (c) the date and time that such voucher was printed; 4 (d) the sequential number or other identification method of such 5 voucher; 6 (e) an identification number, barcode or similar form of encryption 7 that may be used to validate the prize amount payable to the player; and 8 (f) the period of time during which unused tickets or prize amounts 9 must be claimed. 10 6. (a) [For the purposes of this subdivision, the following terms 11 shall have the following meanings: 12 (i) "Active local member" shall mean an individual who participates in 13 the activities of an authorized organization and resides within the 14 county where the authorized organization is located or an adjoining 15 county, as defined by rules promulgated by the commission. 16 (ii) "Existing authorized organization" shall mean an authorized 17 organization that was licensed to conduct games of chance prior to the 18 effective date of this subdivision. 19 (iii) "New authorized organization" shall mean an authorized organiza- 20 tion that is first licensed to conduct games of chance on or after the 21 effective date of this subdivision. 22 (iv) "Gaming facility" shall mean any commercial casino, video lottery 23 terminal facility, or tribal gaming facility operating pursuant to state 24 or federal law. Locations of such facilities shall be those identified 25 by the commission. 26 (b)] The maximum number of electronic bell jar vending machines that 27 [an existing authorized] a veteran organization or volunteer fire compa- 28 ny may operate shall be determined [based upon the number of its active 29 local members, as follows: 30 (i) An existing authorized organization with fewer than fifty active 31 local members may operate a maximum number of one electronic bell jar 32 vending machine; 33 (ii) An existing authorized organization with fifty or more but fewer 34 than one hundred active local members may operate a maximum of two elec- 35 tronic bell jar vending machines; 36 (iii) An existing authorized organization with one hundred or more 37 active local members but fewer than two hundred active local members may 38 operate a maximum of three electronic bell jar vending machines; 39 (iv) An existing authorized organization with two hundred or more but 40 fewer than three hundred active local members may operate a maximum of 41 four electronic bell jar vending machines; and 42 (v) An existing authorized organization with three hundred or more 43 active local members may operate a maximum of five electronic bell jar 44 vending machines. 45 (c) A new authorized organization may operate a maximum of one elec- 46 tronic bell jar vending machine. 47 (d) (i) For any authorized organization at a premises located within 48 fifteen miles of any gaming facility, the maximum number of electronic 49 bell jar vending machines that may be operated shall be one, notwith- 50 standing the provisions of paragraph (b) of this subdivision; provided 51 however, that this limitation shall not apply to gaming facilities 52 located within cities with a population of one million or more as of the 53 latest federal decennial census. 54 (ii) For any authorized organization at a premises located more than 55 fifteen miles but not more than twenty-five miles from any gaming facil- 56 ity, the maximum number of electronic bell jar vending machines that may A. 9433 7 1 be operated shall be three, notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph 2 (b) of this subdivision. 3 (iii)] by the commission, but shall in no event exceed three machines. 4 (b) (i) The use of an electronic bell jar vending machine shall not be 5 approved or permitted in any location restricted by a compact between an 6 Indian tribe and the state of New York, as determined by the commission. 7 (ii) In cities with a population of one million or more as of the 8 latest federal decennial census, the following geographic considerations 9 shall apply, notwithstanding any other provision of this paragraph or 10 paragraph [(b)] (a) of this subdivision: 11 For any [authorized] veteran organization or volunteer fire company at 12 a premises located within two thousand five hundred feet of any gaming 13 facility, the maximum number of electronic bell jar vending machines 14 that may be operated shall be one. The commission shall establish proce- 15 dures for measuring such distance. For any [authorized] veteran organ- 16 ization or volunteer fire company at a premises located more than two 17 thousand five hundred feet but not more than one mile from any gaming 18 facility, the maximum number of electronic bell jar vending machines 19 that may be operated shall be [one for new authorized organizations. For 20 existing authorized organizations within this zone, the maximum number 21 of electronic bell jar vending machines shall be] two, provided that the 22 commission, in authorizing such machines, considers local market condi- 23 tions and the objectives of preventing market oversaturation. For any 24 [authorized] veteran organization or volunteer fire company at a prem- 25 ises located more than one mile from any gaming facility, the maximum 26 number of electronic bell jar vending machines shall be [determined in 27 accordance with paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subdivision] three, 28 provided that the commission shall retain the discretion to impose 29 stricter limitations based on local density of [authorized] veteran 30 organizations and/or volunteer fire companies operating such machines, 31 potential impact on existing gaming facilities, and [other local market 32 conditions specific to such city] the determination of the commission of 33 what will best serve public convenience, consistent with the objectives 34 set forth in paragraph [(e)] (c) of this subdivision. The commission 35 shall, by rule or regulation, further define the methodology for assess- 36 ing local density and market conditions within such cities and may 37 establish specific zones or areas where the placement of electronic bell 38 jar vending machines is further limited or requires enhanced review, to 39 ensure the responsible integration of such charitable gaming opportu- 40 nities. 41 [(iv)] (iii) The commission shall have the authority to establish, by 42 rule or regulation, specific proximity zones around gaming facilities 43 and to modify the limitations provided in subparagraphs (i)[,] and 44 (ii)[, and (iii)] of this paragraph based upon [local market conditions] 45 the determination of the commission of what will best serve public 46 convenience, potential impact on existing gaming facilities, and the 47 need to prevent loss of employment at such facilities, provided that any 48 such modification shall be consistent with the objective of supporting 49 charitable fundraising while maintaining the existing gaming landscape 50 and preventing market oversaturation; provided however, that any such 51 modification shall constitute only a reduction of the thresholds estab- 52 lished by this subdivision. 53 [(e)] (c) (i) Notwithstanding any other provision of this [subdivi- 54 sion] article, the commission shall have the discretion to determine the 55 number of electronic bell jar vending machines that may be operated by 56 any [authorized] veteran organization or volunteer fire company, and the A. 9433 8 1 location of such machines; provided, however, that such number of 2 machines shall not exceed the limits established in this subdivision. 3 Such discretion shall be exercised to ensure that the introduction and 4 operation of electronic bell jar vending machines occurs exclusively to 5 the fundraising capabilities of legitimate [charitable] veteran organ- 6 izations or volunteer fire companies while maintaining the stability of 7 existing regulated gaming sectors and revenue to the state, and avoiding 8 any loss of employment at existing gaming facilities. 9 (ii) [The commission may require periodic reporting or verification of 10 active local membership to ensure ongoing compliance with eligibility 11 requirements and may take enforcement action in cases of material 12 misrepresentation or sustained noncompliance. The commission may also 13 take into consideration reasonable and periodic fluctuations in member- 14 ship to avoid requiring the removal or retirement of electronic bell jar 15 vending machines due to temporary or minimal decreases in membership. 16 (iii)] The commission shall deny, revoke, or limit the number of elec- 17 tronic bell jar vending machines [an authorized] a veteran organization 18 or volunteer fire company may operate if [it] the commission determines 19 that such organization has been established, structured, or is being 20 utilized, directly or indirectly, to obtain a greater number of machines 21 than otherwise would be permitted. This consideration includes, but is 22 not limited to, the creation of subsidiary entities, shell organiza- 23 tions, or any other arrangement where the facts and circumstances indi- 24 cate an intent to circumvent the limitations set forth in this subdivi- 25 sion. The commission is empowered to scrutinize the governance, 26 operational control, and financial interdependence of organizations to 27 make such determinations. 28 [(iv)] (iii) The co-siting or joint housing of multiple [authorized] 29 veteran organizations and/or volunteer fire companies at a single prem- 30 ises or contiguous premises for the primary purpose of increasing the 31 aggregate number of electronic bell jar vending machines at such 32 location beyond what would otherwise be permitted for a single [author- 33 ized] veteran organization or volunteer fire company operating at such 34 premises is prohibited, unless explicitly authorized by the commission 35 upon a finding that such arrangement is consistent with the public 36 interest and the objectives of this article. The commission shall 37 promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate this provision, consider- 38 ing factors such as shared operational control, membership overlap, and 39 the primary purpose of the co-siting arrangement. 40 7. The commission shall promulgate such rules and regulations as may 41 be necessary for the implementation of electronic bell jar vending 42 machine gaming in accordance with the provisions of this section, 43 including, but not limited to, the [verification of active local member- 44 ship numbers and] assessment of proximity to gaming facilities. 45 8. The commission shall promulgate such rules and regulations as the 46 commission may deem necessary to ensure that electronic bell jar vending 47 machines are only accessible to bona fide members of the veterans organ- 48 ization or bona fide members of the volunteer fire company. Such 49 machines shall not be accessible to the public or to any individual who 50 is not a bona fide member of such organization or company; provided, 51 however, that the commission may authorize the use of such machines at 52 each veteran organization's or volunteer fire company's fundraising 53 events on no more than four occasions per calendar year, at which time 54 such machines may be made accessible to individuals who are not bona 55 fide members, subject to such supervision and safeguards as the commis- A. 9433 9 1 sion may require, including measures to ensure that no individual under 2 the age of eighteen participates. 3 § 7. Subdivisions 1, 4, and 5 of section 195-o of the general munici- 4 pal law, as amended by a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the gener- 5 al municipal law relating to electronic bell jar games, as proposed in 6 legislative bills numbers S. 6351-B and A. 7475-B, are amended and a new 7 subdivision 5-a is added to read as follows: 8 1. Distribution; distributors. Any distributor licensed in accordance 9 with section one hundred eighty-nine-a of this article to distribute 10 bell jar tickets or electronic bell jar vending machines shall purchase 11 such tickets and vending machines only from licensed manufacturers and 12 may manufacture coin boards and merchandise boards only as authorized in 13 subdivision one-a of this section. Licensed distributors of bell jar 14 tickets [and electronic bell jar vending machines] shall sell such tick- 15 ets and vending machines only to not-for-profit, charitable or religious 16 organizations registered by the commission and shall sell, lease or 17 otherwise distribute electronic bell jar vending machines only to eligi- 18 ble veteran organizations or volunteer fire companies as set forth in 19 this article. Any licensed distributor who willfully violates the 20 provisions of this section shall: (a) upon such first offense, have 21 their license suspended for a period of thirty days; (b) upon such 22 second offense, participate in a hearing to be conducted by the commis- 23 sion, and surrender their license for such period as recommended by the 24 commission; and (c) upon such third or subsequent offense, have their 25 license suspended for a period of one year and shall be guilty of a 26 class E felony. Any unlicensed distributor who violates this section 27 shall be guilty of a class E felony. 28 4. Invoices; agreements. (a) A distributor shall supply with each sale 29 of a bell jar product an itemized invoice showing the distributor's name 30 and address, the purchaser's name, address, and license number, the date 31 of the sale, the account number identifying the sale from the manufac- 32 turer to distributor and the account number identifying the sale from 33 the distributor to the licensed organization, and the description of the 34 deals, including the form number, the serial number and the ideal gross 35 from every deal of bell jar or similar game. 36 (b) Prior to the sale, lease, or distribution of an electronic bell 37 jar vending machine to [an authorized] a veteran organization or volun- 38 teer fire company, the distributor or manufacturer shall provide the 39 contract or agreement for such sale, lease or distribution to the 40 commission for approval and any modification to such contract or agree- 41 ment thereafter. Such contract or agreement shall show, at minimum: 42 (i) the name and address of the [authorized] veteran organization or 43 volunteer fire company; 44 (ii) the date of sale, lease or distribution; 45 (iii) the serial number of each such machine; 46 (iv) the material terms and conditions of such contract or agreement; 47 and 48 (v) any additional information as the commission may require. 49 (c) The commission may promulgate rules and regulations relating to 50 the terms of any contract or agreement for the sale, lease, or distrib- 51 ution of an electronic bell jar vending machine to [an authorized] a 52 veteran organization or volunteer fire company, including, but not 53 limited to, regulations to ensure that revenue from play on such 54 machines appropriately benefits the veteran organization and does not, 55 instead, primarily or unduly benefit any other entity, including the 56 distributor or manufacturer. The commission [shall], in its sole A. 9433 10 1 discretion, may approve or deny such contract or agreement [within thir- 2 ty days of receipt] and any material modification to such contract or 3 agreement thereafter. If the commission denies approval for such 4 contract, agreement or modification, it shall provide the reasons for 5 such determination. 6 5. Reports. A distributor shall report quarterly to the gaming commis- 7 sion, on a form prescribed by the gaming commission, its sales of each 8 type of bell jar deal or tickets and electronic bell jar vending 9 machines. This report shall be filed quarterly on or before the twenti- 10 eth day of the month succeeding the end of the quarter in which the sale 11 was made. The [gaming] commission may require that a distributor submit 12 the quarterly report and invoices required by this section via electron- 13 ic media or electronic data transfer. 14 5-a. Any costs of the commission necessary to maintain regulatory 15 control over electronic bell jar machines shall be assessed annually on 16 distributors of electronic bell jar machines in proportion to the number 17 of such machines that have been distributed that are operational at any 18 point in such year. Each distributor shall pay the amount assessed 19 against it within thirty days after the date of the notice of assessment 20 from the commission. 21 § 8. Subdivision 3 of section 195-q of the general municipal law, as 22 added by a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the general municipal 23 law relating to electronic bell jar games, as proposed in legislative 24 bills numbers S. 6351-B and A. 7475-B, is amended to read as follows: 25 3. (a) [An authorized] A veteran organization or volunteer fire compa- 26 ny may [only] operate electronic bell jar vending machines only on prem- 27 ises that it owns or leases. All such locations must be identified by 28 the veteran organization or volunteer fire company and approved by the 29 commission prior to the placement of any electronic bell jar machine at 30 those premises. 31 (b) [An authorized] A veteran organization or volunteer fire company 32 may operate no more machines than the number permitted in [subdivision 33 six of] section one hundred ninety-five-c of this article. 34 (c) No [authorized] veteran organization or volunteer fire company 35 shall operate an electronic bell jar vending machine unless [it] such 36 veteran organization or volunteer fire company is a [games of chance] 37 games-of-chance licensee authorized by the commission to operate an 38 electronic bell jar vending machine. The commission may promulgate 39 rules and regulations as [may be] the commission deems necessary for the 40 approval of [an authorized] a veteran organization or volunteer fire 41 company to operate an electronic bell jar vending machine. [The commis- 42 sion may revoke, suspend, or condition such approval. The commission 43 shall approve or deny such request for such approval within thirty 44 days.] If the commission denies such request, it shall provide the 45 reasons for such determination. 46 (d) The commission may authorize a veteran organization or volunteer 47 fire company to operate electronic bell jar games only if such veteran 48 organization or volunteer fire company was licensed to operate bell jar 49 games as of November thirtieth, two thousand twenty-five. 50 (e) Each electronic bell jar vending machine shall generate sales 51 reports and such other information that the commission may direct by 52 regulation. The commission shall have access to the server of each 53 electronic bell jar vending machine for the purpose of monitoring and 54 auditing at no cost to the state. A. 9433 11 1 [(e)] (f) Any unclaimed funds or tickets left in any electronic bell 2 jar vending machine shall be retained by the authorized organization and 3 reported as net proceeds. 4 § 9. A chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the general municipal law 5 relating to electronic bell jar games, as proposed in legislative bills 6 numbers S. 6351-B and A. 7475-B, is amended by adding a new section 9-a 7 to read as follows: 8 § 9-a. The provisions of this act are not severable from each other 9 and are intended to be integrated with and integral to the whole. If any 10 portion of this act is held by a court to be void or unenforceable then 11 the remaining provisions of this act shall also be deemed void and unen- 12 forceable. 13 § 10. Section 10 of a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the general 14 municipal law relating to electronic bell jar games, as proposed in 15 legislative bills numbers S. 6351-B and A. 7475-B, is amended to read as 16 follows: 17 § 10. This act shall take effect [immediately] one year after it shall 18 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment 19 and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation 20 of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made on or before 21 such date. 22 § 11. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, 23 sections one, two, three, four, five, six, seven, eight, and nine of 24 this act shall take effect on the same date and in the same manner as a 25 chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the general municipal law relating 26 to electronic bell jar games, as proposed in legislative bills numbers 27 S. 6351-B and A. 7475-B, takes effect.